sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Posteljno perilo in posteljnina > Brisače: Kopalne brisače in krpe za umivanje; Brisače za plažo; Brisače za roke; Brisače za lase; Kuhinjske krpe
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Patalynė ir baltiniai > Rankšluosčiai: Vonios rankšluosčiai ir medžiaginės kempinės; Paplūdimio rankšluosčiai; Rankšluosčiai rankoms; Galvos rankšluosčiai; Virtuviniai rankšluosčiai
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Λευκά είδη & κλινοσκεπάσματα > Πετσέτες: Πετσέτες & πετσετάκια μπάνιου; Πετσέτες θαλάσσης; Πετσέτες χεριών; Πετσέτες κεφαλιού; Πετσέτες κουζίνας
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 床包被套 > 毛巾: 浴巾和毛巾; 沙灘巾; 手帕; 頭巾; 廚房擦巾
nl: Huis en tuin > Linnengoed > Handdoeken: Badhandboeken en washandjes; Strandlakens; Handdoeken; Hoofddoeken; Keukendoeken
nb: Hjem og hage > Lakner og sengetøy > Håndklær: Badehåndklær og vaskekluter; Strandhåndklær; Håndklær; Hodehåndklær; Kjøkkenhåndklær
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Домашен текстил и спално бельо > Хавлиени кърпи: Хавлиени кърпи за баня и кърпи за миене; Хавлиени кърпи за плаж; Хавлиени кърпи за ръце; Хавлиени кърпи за глава; Хавлиени кухненски кърпи
th: บ้านและสวน > ผ้าปูที่นอนและของใช้บนเตียง > ผ้าขนหนู: ผ้าเช็ดตัวและผ้าขนหนู; ผ้าขนหนูชายหาด; ผ้าขนหนูเช็ดมือ; ผ้าขนหนูเช็ดศีรษะ; ผ้าขนหนูที่ใช้ในห้องครัว
vi: Nhà và vườn > Vải lanh và bộ đồ giường > Khăn tắm: Khăn mặt và khăn tắm; Khăn đi biển; Khăn tay; Khăn tắm trùm đầu; Khăn bếp
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 리넨 제품/침구 > 수건: 목욕 타월/세안 타월; 비치 타월; 핸드 타월; 헤어 타월; 키친타월
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Yatak Çarşaf ve Nevresimleri > Havlular: Banyo Havluları ve Sabunluklar; Plaj Havluları; El Havluları; Baş Havluları; Mutfak Havluları
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Liina- ja vuodevaatteet > Pyyhkeet: Kylpypyyhkeet ja liinat; Rantapyyhkeet; Käsipyyhkeet; Pääpyyhkeet; Keittiöpyyhkeet
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 床上用品 > 毛巾: 浴巾/毛巾; 沙滩毛巾; 手巾; 头巾; 厨房用布
es: Casa y jardín > Ropa de casa > Toallas: Toallas de baño y manoplas; Toallas de playa; Toallas de mano; Toallas para la cabeza; Paños de cocina
en: Home & Garden > Linens & Bedding > Towels: Bath Towels & Washcloths; Beach Towels; Hand Towels; Head Towels; Kitchen Towels
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Obliečky a posteľná bielizeň > Uteráky: Osušky a uteráky; Plážové osušky; Uteráky na ruky; Uteráky na vlasy; Kuchynské utierky
cs: Dům a zahrada > Prádlo > Ručníky: Osušky a žínky; Plážové osušky; Ručníky na ruce; Ručníky na hlavu; Kuchyňské ručníky
da: Hjem og have > Linned og sengetøj > Håndklæder: Badehåndlæder og vaskeklude; Strandhåndklæder; Håndklæder til hænder; Håndklæder til hovedet; Viskestykker
pl: Dom i ogród > Bielizna stołowa i pościelowa > Ręczniki: Ręczniki kąpielowe i myjki; Ręczniki plażowe; Ręczniki do rąk; Ręczniki do głowy; Ściereczki kuchenne
de: Heim & Garten > Bett- und Haushaltswäsche > Handtücher: Badhandtücher & Waschlappen; Strandtücher; Mini-Handtücher; Haarhandtuch; Geschirrtücher
it: Casa e giardino > Biancheria > Teli per bagno: Asciugamani e salviette da bagno; Asciugamani da spiaggia; Asciugamani; Asciugamani per la testa; Asciugamani da cucina
fr: Maison et jardin > Linge > Serviettes: Serviettes de bain et gants de toilette; Serviettes de plage; Essuie-mains; Serviettes de tête; Torchons
sv: Hem och trädgård > Linne och sängkläder > Handdukar: Badhanddukar och tvättlappar; Strandhanddukar; Gästhanddukar; Hårhanddukar; Kökshanddukar
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Lençóis e roupas de cama > Toalhas: Toalhas de banho e toalhinhas de lavabo; Toalhas de praia; Toalhas de mão; Toalhas de cabelo; Toalhas de cozinha
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > テーブルリネン・寝具 > タオル: バスリネン; ビーチタオル; ハンドタオル; ヘッドタオル; ふきん
ru: Дом и сад > Кухонный текстиль, постельные принадлежности и полотенца > Полотенца: Банные полотенца и махровые салфетки; Пляжные полотенца; Полотенца для рук; Полотенца для волос; Кухонные полотенца
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Articole textile și lenjerie de pat > Prosoape: Prosoape de baie și lavete pentru spălare; Prosoape de plajă; Prosoape pentru mâini; Prosoape pentru față; Prosoape de bucătărie
hu: Otthon és kert > Textíliák és ágyneműk > Törölközők: Fürdőszobai törölközők és mosókendők; Strand-törölközők; Kéztörölközők; Fejtörölközők; Konyhai törölközők
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Posteljina i krevetnina > Ručnici: Ručnici i krpice za umivanje; Ručnici za plažu; Ručnici za ruke; Ručnici za kosu; Kuhinjske krpe
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Atoalhados e roupa de cama > Toalhas: Toalhas de banho e rosto; Toalhas de praia; Toalhas de mão; Toalhas de cabeça; Toalhas de cozinha